test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-47asi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - asi: # Noun (47) asi 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     asi+N+Sg+Nom: asi
     asi+N+Sg+Gen: asʼa
     asi+N+Sg+Par: asja
     asi+N+Sg+Ill: asja
     asi+N+Sg+Ine: [asʼan, asʼah, asʼahn]
     asi+N+Sg+Ela: asʼast
     asi+N+Sg+All: asʼalõ
     asi+N+Sg+Ade: asʼal
     asi+N+Sg+Abl: asʼalt
     asi+N+Sg+Tra: asʼas
     asi+N+Sg+Ter: asʼaniq
     asi+N+Sg+Abe: asʼaldaq
     asi+N+Sg+Com: asʼagaq
     asi+N+Pl+Nom: asʼaq
     asi+N+Pl+Gen: asjo
     asi+N+Pl+Par: asjo
     asi+N+Pl+Ill: [asjohe, asjo, asjodõ]
     asi+N+Pl+Ine: [asʼon, asʼoh, asʼohn]
     asi+N+Pl+Ela: asʼost
     asi+N+Pl+All: asʼolõ
     asi+N+Pl+Ade: asʼol
     asi+N+Pl+Abl: asʼolt
     asi+N+Pl+Tra: asʼos
     asi+N+Pl+Ter: asʼoniq
     asi+N+Pl+Abe: asʼoldaq
     asi+N+Pl+Com: asjogaq
